District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.10

Date of transfer of assets and authority.

No later than October 1, 2008, the transition plan required by § 7-771.09, as approved, shall be implemented.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 11, 55 DCR 216

History